Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 10 Regulation of Fireworks

Administrative rules and regulations.

Fireworks Manufacturing and Fireworks or Pyrotechnics Exhibitions and Displays, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Comptroller General, Chapter 120-3-22.

25-10-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Consumer fireworks” means any small fireworks devices containing restricted amounts of pyrotechnic composition, designed primarily to produce visible or audible effects by combustion, that comply with the construction, chemical composition, and labeling regulations of the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission as provided for in Parts 1500 and 1507 of Title 16 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the United States Department of Transportation as provided for in Part 172 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and the American Pyrotechnics Association as provided for in the 2001 American Pyrotechnics Association Standard 87-1, and additionally shall mean Roman candles.

“Consumer fireworks retail sales facility” shall have the same meaning as provided for by NFPA 1124; provided, however, that such term shall not include a tent, canopy, or membrane structure.

“Consumer fireworks retail sales stand” shall have the same meaning as provided for by NFPA 1124.

“Distributor” means any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership which sells consumer fireworks.

(4.1)

“Electric plant” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 46-3A-1.

“Fireworks” means any combustible or explosive composition or any substance or combination of substances or article prepared for the purpose of producing a visible or audible effect by combustion, explosion, deflagration, or detonation, including blank cartridges, firecrackers, torpedos, skyrockets, bombs, sparklers, and other combustibles and explosives of like construction, as well as articles containing any explosive or flammable compound and tablets and other devices containing an explosive substance.

“NFPA 1124” means the National Fire Protection Association Standard 1124, Code for the Manufacture, Transportation, Storage, and Retail Sales of Fireworks and Pyrotechnic Articles, 2006 Edition.

“Nonprofit group” means any entity exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, any entity incorporated under Chapter 3 of Title 14, the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” or a sponsored organization of a public or private elementary or secondary school in this state.

“Proximate audience” means an audience closer to pyrotechnic devices than permitted by the National Fire Protection Association Standard 1123, Code for Fireworks Display, as adopted by the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Pyrotechnics” means fireworks.

“Store” shall have the same meaning as provided for by NFPA 1124; provided, however, that such term shall only include such buildings with at least 4,000 square feet of retail display space and wherefrom:

No more than 25 percent of such retail display space is used for consumer fireworks and items or products as provided for under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section; and

Other items or products which are not consumer fireworks or items or products as provided for under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section are sold;

and provided, further, that such term means a person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership with more than one mercantile location, where all such mercantile locations are collectively known to the public by the same name or share central management.

“Waste-water treatment plant” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 43-51-2.

“Water treatment plant” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 43-51-2.

As used in this chapter, the term “consumer fireworks” or “fireworks” shall not include:

Model rockets and model rocket engines designed, sold, and used for the purpose of propelling recoverable aero models, toy pistol paper caps in which the explosive content averages 0.25 grains or less of explosive mixture per paper cap or toy pistols, toy cannons, toy canes, toy guns, or other devices using such paper caps; nor shall the term “consumer fireworks” or “fireworks” include ammunition consumed by weapons used for sporting and hunting purposes; and

Wire or wood sparklers of 100 grams or less of mixture per item; other sparkling items which are nonexplosive and nonaerial and contain 75 grams or less of chemical compound per tube or a total of 500 grams or less for multiple tubes; snake and glow worms; smoke devices; or trick noise makers which include paper streamers, party poppers, string poppers, snappers, and drop pops each consisting of 0.25 grains or less of explosive mixture.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 550, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 11, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 798, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 294, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 596, § 1/SB 133; Ga. L. 2007, p. 47, § 25/SB 103; Ga. L. 2015, p. 274, § 2/HB 110; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 5/HB 727.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, added paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(4); redesignated former paragraph (a)(1) as present paragraph (a)(5); near the middle of present paragraph (a)(5), deleted “balloons requiring fire underneath to propel them,” preceding “fireworks” and deleted “Roman candles” preceding “bombs”; added paragraphs (a)(6) and (a)(7); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(2) and (a)(3) as present paragraphs (a)(8) and (a)(9), respectively; added paragraphs (a)(11) and (a)(12); inserted “‘consumer fireworks’ or” in subsection (b) and paragraph (b)(1); and, in the middle of paragraph (b)(2), substituted “500 grams” for “200 grams” and inserted “smoke devices; or”.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (a)(2); added paragraph (a)(4.1); added “, any entity incorporated under Chapter 3 of Title 14, the ‘Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,’ or a sponsored organization of a public or private elementary or secondary school in this state” at the end of paragraph (a)(7); deleted former paragraph (a)(10), which read: “‘Retail chain’ means a person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership with more than one store, where all such stores are collectively known to the public by the same name or share central management.”; redesignated former paragraph (a)(11) as present paragraph (a)(10), and, in paragraph (a)(10), added the proviso at the end of the introductory language and added subparagraphs (a)(10)(A) and (a)(10)(B); and added paragraphs (a)(11) and (a)(12).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “party poppers, string poppers” was substituted for “party peppers, string peppers” in paragraph (b)(2).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2003).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-10-2.
Prohibited fireworks activities; application of noise ordinances.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership to offer for sale at retail or wholesale, to use or ignite or cause to be ignited, or to possess, manufacture, transport, or store any consumer fireworks or fireworks, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership to sell consumer fireworks or any items defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-10-1 to any person under 18 years of age.

It shall be unlawful to sell consumer fireworks or any items defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-10-1 to any person by any means other than an in-person, face-to-face sale. Such person shall provide proper identification to the seller at the time of such purchase. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “proper identification” means any document issued by a governmental agency containing a description of the person or such person’s photograph, or both, and giving such person’s date of birth and includes without being limited to a passport, military identification card, driver’s license, or identification card authorized under Code Sections 40-5-100 through 40-5-104.

It shall be unlawful to use fireworks, consumer fireworks, or any items defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-10-1 indoors or within the right of way of a public road, street, highway, or railroad of this state.

Except as provided for in subparagraph (D) or (E) of this paragraph and subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection and Code Section 25-10-2.1, it shall be lawful for any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership to use or ignite or cause to be ignited any consumer fireworks:

On any day beginning at the time of 10:00 A.M. and up to and including the ending time of 11:59 P.M., unless during such times the noise from such use or ignition is not in compliance with a noise ordinance of a county or municipal corporation as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, except as otherwise provided for under this subparagraph; provided, however, that a county or municipal corporation may additionally require the issuance of a special use permit pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph for use or ignition;

On January 1, the last Saturday and Sunday in May, July 3, July 4, the first Monday in September, and December 31 of each year after the time of 10:00 A.M. and up to and including the time of 11:59 P.M.; and

On January 1 of each year beginning at the time of 12:00 Midnight and up to and including the ending time of 1:00 A.M.

Subject to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, paragraph (4) of this subsection, and Code Section 25-10-2.1, it shall be lawful for any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership to use or ignite or cause to be ignited any consumer fireworks anywhere in this state except:

As provided for under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

In any location where such person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership is not lawfully present or is not otherwise lawfully permitted to use or ignite or cause to be ignited any consumer fireworks;

Within 100 yards of an electric plant; water treatment plant; waste-water treatment plant; a facility engaged in the retail sale of gasoline or other flammable or combustible liquids or gases where the volume stored is in excess of 500 gallons for the purpose of retail sale; a facility engaged in the production, refining, processing, or blending of any flammable or combustible liquids or gases for retail purposes; any public or private electric substation; or a jail or prison;

Within 100 yards of the boundaries of any public use air facility provided for under Title 6 or any public use landing area or platform marked and designed for landing use by helicopters;

Within any park, historic site, recreational area, or other property which is owned by or operated by, for, or under the custody and control of a governing authority of a county or municipal corporation, except pursuant to a special use permit as provided for in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph;

Within any park, historic site, recreational area, or other property which is owned by or operated by, for, or under the custody and control of the State of Georgia, except pursuant to any rules and regulations of the agency or department having control of such property which may allow for such use or ignition of consumer fireworks;

Within 100 yards of a hospital, nursing home, or other health care facility regulated under Chapter 7 of Title 31; provided, however, that an owner or operator of such facility may use or ignite or cause to be ignited consumer fireworks on the property of such facility or may grant written permission to any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership to use or ignite or cause to be ignited consumer fireworks on the property of such facility; or

While under the influence of alcohol or any drug or any combination of alcohol and any drug to the extent that it is less safe or unlawful for such person to ignite consumer fireworks as provided for in Code Section 25-10-2.1.

Any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership may use or ignite or cause to be ignited any consumer fireworks as provided for under divisions (3)(B)(i) and (3)(C)(v) of this subsection if such person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership is issued a special use permit pursuant to the law of a governing authority of a county or municipal corporation for the use or ignition of consumer fireworks in a location within such county or municipality as provided for under divisions (3)(B)(i) and (3)(C)(v) of this subsection, provided that such special use permit is required for such use or ignition. Such special use permit shall designate the time or times and location that such person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership may use or ignite or cause to be ignited such consumer fireworks. A fee assessed by a county or municipal corporation for the issuance of a special use permit pursuant to this subparagraph shall not exceed $100.00. No governing authority or official of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision shall bear liability for any decisions made pursuant to this Code section.

Whenever the Keetch-Byram Drought Index reaches a level of 700 or above for any geographical area within a county, the Governor may, in consultation with the State Forestry Commission and the Department of Natural Resources and for purposes of this Code section, issue a declaration of drought for such county and enact further regulations and restrictions prohibiting any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership to ignite or cause to be ignited consumer fireworks within the boundaries of such county for the duration of such declaration; provided, however, that upon expiration or conclusion of such declaration or the level on the Keetch-Byram Drought Index receding below 700, whichever occurs first, such further regulations or restrictions shall be rescinded by law.

It shall be lawful for any person 18 years of age or older to use or ignite or cause to be ignited or to possess, manufacture, transport, or store consumer fireworks.

To the extent otherwise permitted by law, it shall be lawful for any person who is 16 or 17 years of age to possess or transport consumer fireworks, provided that such person is serving as an assistant to a distributor licensed under subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1 or the nonprofit group benefiting from such distributor’s application pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1 and is not transporting such consumer fireworks on a highway which constitutes a part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

It shall be lawful for any person 18 years of age or older to sell or to offer for sale at retail or wholesale any consumer fireworks pursuant to the requirements of this chapter.

It shall be lawful for any person who is 16 or 17 years of age to sell or to offer for sale at retail or wholesale any consumer fireworks, provided that such person is serving as an assistant to a distributor licensed under subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1 or the nonprofit group benefiting from such distributor’s application pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1.

It shall be lawful to sell consumer fireworks from a permanent consumer fireworks retail sales facility or store only if such permanent consumer fireworks retail sales facility or store is:

In compliance with the requirements for such a permanent consumer fireworks retail sales facility or store in the selling of consumer fireworks as provided for in NFPA 1124; and

Selling consumer fireworks of a distributor licensed pursuant to subsection (b) or (d) of Code Section 25-10-5.1.

It shall be lawful to sell consumer fireworks from a temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stand only if such temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stand is:

In compliance with the requirements for such a temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stand in the selling of consumer fireworks as provided for in NFPA 1124;

Within 1,000 feet of a fire hydrant of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision or a fire department connection of a building affiliated with such consumer fireworks retail sales stand, unless the chief administrative officer of the fire department of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision or chartered fire department legally organized to operate in this state pursuant to Chapter 3 of this title and having operational authority over such location of the temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stand provides in writing that such temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stand may operate in excess of 1,000 feet from such fire hydrant or fire department connection; and

Selling consumer fireworks of a distributor licensed pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1.

A distributor licensed pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1 may operate no more than two temporary consumer fireworks retail sales stands in this state per location licensed pursuant to subsection (b) or (d) of Code Section 25-10-5.1; provided, however, that such distributor has been operating and open to the public pursuant to subsection (b) or (d) of Code Section 25-10-5.1 no less than 30 days prior to July 4 or December 31 in the year of an application for a license under subsection (c) of Code Section 25-10-5.1 that is filed within 30 days of July 4 or December 31.

It shall be unlawful to sell consumer fireworks from any motor vehicle, from a trailer towed by a motor vehicle, or from a tent, canopy, or membrane structure.

Any noise ordinance of a county or municipal corporation which is to have effect for purposes of subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i) shall have been enacted or reenacted on or after July 1, 2018, and shall:

Be a general noise ordinance concerning all manner of sounds or noises and such county or municipal corporation shall not have any ordinance separately pertaining to sounds or noises emanating exclusively from consumer fireworks; and

Not have been enacted or reenacted unless notice of the meeting in which such noise ordinance was enacted or reenacted was published one time at least 15 days in advance of such meeting in the legal organ of such county or municipal corporation and was posted for at least 72 hours at least 15 days in advance of such meeting on the homepage of the official website of such county or municipal corporation. Such notice shall state the date, time, and place of such meeting and that such noise ordinance which will affect the use of consumer fireworks will be acted upon.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 550, § 3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 11, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 945, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 596, § 2/SB 133; Ga. L. 2015, p. 274, § 3/HB 110; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 6/HB 727; Ga. L. 2018, p. 181, § 1/HB 419.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “consumer fireworks or” near the end of subsection (a) and rewrote subsection (b).

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, substituted “use or ignite or cause to be ignited” for “use or explode or cause to be exploded” in the middle of subsection (a) and rewrote subsection (b).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “9:00 P.M.;” following “ending time of” at the end of division (b)(3)(B)(i); substituted “11:59 P.M., unless during such times the noise from such use or ignition is not in compliance with a noise ordinance of a county or municipal corporation as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section,” for “(ii) On any day after the time of 9:00 P.M. and up to and including the time of 11:59 P.M. if such use or ignition is lawful pursuant to any noise ordinance of the county or municipal corporation of the location in which such use or ignition occurs,”; redesignated former division (b)(3)(B)(iii) as present division (b)(3)(B)(ii); in division (b)(3)(B)(ii), inserted “the last Saturday and Sunday in May,”, inserted “the first Monday in September,”, and substituted “10:00 A.M.” for “9:00 A.M.”; redesignated former division (b)(3)(B)(iv) as present division (b)(3)(B)(iii); substituted “divisions (3)(B)(i) and (3)(C)(v)” for “divisions (3)(B)(ii) and (3)(C)(v)” twice in the first sentence of subparagraph (b)(3)(D); substituted the present provisions of subparagraph (b)(3)(E) for the former provisions, which read: “Whenever the Governor issues a declaration of drought, the Governor may, for the boundaries of the area covered by such declaration, enact further regulations and restrictions concerning the use of consumer fireworks than provided for under this chapter; provided, however, that no such further regulations or restrictions on the use of consumer fireworks shall be effective pursuant to this subparagraph on January 1, July 3, July 4, or December 31 of any year; provided, further, that such further regulations or restrictions shall only apply to the exact boundaries of the area covered by such declaration and shall only apply with regard to the ignition of consumer fireworks; and provided, further, that upon expiration or conclusion of such declaration, such further regulations or restrictions shall be rescinded by law.”; and added subsection (c).

Cross references.

Nuisance defined generally, §

41-1-1

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-10-2.1.
Use of fireworks and consumer fireworks while under the influence; violation.

It shall be unlawful for any person to ignite consumer fireworks or fireworks while:

Under the influence of alcohol or any drug or any combination of alcohol and any drug to the extent that it is unsafe for such person to ignite consumer fireworks or fireworks; or

Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, there is any amount of marijuana or a controlled substance, as defined in Code Section 16-13-21, present in such person’s blood or urine, or both, including the metabolites and derivatives of each or both, without regard to whether or not any alcohol is present in such person’s breath or blood.

The fact that any person charged with violating this Code section is or has been legally entitled to use a drug shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this Code section; provided, however, that such person shall not be in violation of this Code section unless such person is rendered incapable of igniting consumer fireworks or fireworks safely as a result of using a drug other than alcohol which such person is legally entitled to use.

Any person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-10-2.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 7/HB 727.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 26, 2016.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-10-3.
Permitted sales and uses of fireworks.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the following:

The wholesale or retail sale of fireworks for use in a public exhibition or public display and the transportation of fireworks for such use, provided that any person selling at wholesale or retail or transporting fireworks for such use must have a duplicate copy of the permit which has been issued by the judge of the probate court to a person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership which has been authorized to hold a public exhibition or display, and provided, further, that the seller maintains and makes available for inspection by the Safety Fire Commissioner or the designee thereof the record of any such fireworks sale for a period of 18 months from the date of sale;

Use by railroads or other transportation agencies of fireworks specifically designed and intended for signal purposes or illumination;

The sale or use of blank cartridges for a show or theater or for signal or ceremonial purposes in athletic or sports events or for use by military or police organizations; or

The manufacture of any fireworks not prohibited by Congress or any federal agency; the possession, transportation, and storage of any such fireworks by any manufacturer thereof; the storage of certain such fireworks by a nonmanufacturer in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 25-10-3.1; the possession, transportation, or distribution of any such fireworks to a distributor located outside this state; the sale of such fireworks by any such manufacturer to a distributor located outside this state; or the possession and transportation of such fireworks by any manufacturer or contractor or common carrier from the point of manufacture within this state to any point outside this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 550, § 5; Ga. L. 1962, p. 11, § 4; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1144, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 945, § 2.

25-10-3.1.
Storage of fireworks by licensed nonmanufacturers.

Fireworks defined as Class B explosives or the equivalent thereof by regulations of the United States Department of Transportation set forth in Part 173 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and which are to be used only for purposes of a public exhibition or display pursuant to Code Section 25-10-4 may be stored by a person, firm, or corporation, other than a manufacturer, pursuant to a magazine license issued by the Safety Fire Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Any application for such a license shall be made to the Safety Fire Commissioner in a form to be prescribed by the Commissioner. The application shall include a letter of acknowledgment and endorsement from the local authority having responsibility for fire suppression.

Any application for a magazine license made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be accompanied by plans for the magazine proposed to be used for storage of Class B explosives or the equivalent thereof, in such detail and in such number of copies as required by the Safety Fire Commissioner. Construction of a magazine for storage of fireworks pursuant to this Code section shall not commence until the plans therefor have been approved by the state fire marshal and returned to the applicant.

No license shall be issued pursuant to this Code section unless:

The applicant currently holds a valid license or permit to receive explosive materials including Class B explosives or the equivalent thereof issued pursuant to regulations of the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms of the United States Department of the Treasury;

The applicant presents a copy of a valid permit for a public exhibition or display of fireworks issued pursuant to Code Section 25-10-4;

The state fire marshal or the designee thereof has determined upon inspection that the constructed magazine meets or exceeds the requirements for magazines to be used for storing Class B explosives or the equivalent thereof as established by regulations and adopted codes and standards of the Safety Fire Commissioner; and

The state fire marshal or the designee thereof has determined upon inspection that the constructed magazine meets or exceeds any additional requirements applicable to magazines to be used for storage of Class B explosives or the equivalent thereof by nonmanufacturers as may be established by regulation promulgated pursuant to Code Section 25-10-5.

Any license issued pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to the annual license fee and expiration date provisions of Code Section 25-10-5. The initial annual fee for a magazine license shall be submitted along with the application for such license.

Any fireworks stored under any magazine license issued pursuant to this Code section shall be stored in an approved magazine and in accordance with the regulations for storing Class B explosives or the equivalent thereof as established by regulations of the Safety Fire Commissioner and any additional requirements for storage of such explosives by nonmanufacturers as may be established by regulation promulgated pursuant to Code Section 25-10-5, for a period of time not to exceed 60 days before and 60 days after the permitted date of a public exhibition or display of fireworks pursuant to Code Section 25-10-4.

Any violation of the provisions of this Code section shall be grounds for revoking a magazine license.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-10-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 945, § 3.

25-10-3.2.
License required for pyrotechnics exhibits; requirements; penalty for violations.

No person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership shall cause the combustion, explosion, deflagration, detonation, or ignition of pyrotechnics for the purpose of a public exhibition or display before a proximate audience unless such person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership holds a valid license issued by the Safety Fire Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. Any application for such a license shall be made to the Safety Fire Commissioner in the form prescribed by the Safety Fire Commissioner.

All applicants must meet the following requirements for licensure:

The applicant shall submit to the Safety Fire Commissioner proof of a valid comprehensive liability insurance policy purchased from an insurer authorized to do business in Georgia. The coverage must include bodily injury and property damage, products liability, completed operations, and contractual liability. The proof of insurance must also be provided before any license can be renewed. The minimum amount of said coverage shall be $1 million or such other amount as specified by the Safety Fire Commissioner. An insurer that provided such coverage shall notify the Safety Fire Commissioner of any change in coverage;

The applicant shall pay the required licensing fee as prescribed in Code Section 25-10-5; and

The applicant shall comply with all rules and regulations promulgated by the Safety Fire Commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

Any violation of this chapter shall be grounds for revocation or denial of licensure to conduct pyrotechnic displays.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-10-3.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 294, § 2; Ga. L. 2016, p. 64, § 8/HB 727.

The 2016 amendment,

effective April 26, 2016, substituted “deflagration, detonation, or ignition” for “deflagration, or detonation” near the beginning of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 enactment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2003).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U.L. Rev. 55 (2016).

25-10-4.
Requirement of permit for conduct of fireworks display; application; imposition of conditions as to granting of permit; duration and transfer of permit; disposition of excess fireworks; fees.

Any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership desiring to conduct a public exhibition or display of fireworks not before a proximate audience shall first obtain a permit from the judge of the probate court of the county in which the public exhibition or display is to be held. Application for a permit must be made in writing and filed with the judge not less than ten days prior to the date of the proposed public exhibition or display of fireworks. Fireworks distributors located outside this state shall obtain display permit application forms and provide the same to applicants upon request. The judge may grant a permit for the display on the following conditions:

That the display be conducted by a competent operator approved by the judge;

That the display shall be of such character as in the opinion of the judge will not be hazardous to persons or property;

That the local fire official responsible for the area in question certifies in writing that the site for the display meets his or her approval and is in compliance with all applicable codes; and

That the application be accompanied by a bond in the principal sum of $10,000.00, payable to the county in which the display is being held and conditioned for the payment of damages which may be caused either to persons or to property by reason of the display or, alternatively, that the application be accompanied by evidence that the applicant carries proper liability insurance for bodily injury in the amount of not less than $25,000.00 for each person and $50,000.00 for each accident and for property damage in the amount of not less than $25,000.00 for each accident and $50,000.00 aggregate, with an insurance company duly licensed by the Commissioner of Insurance.

Any person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership desiring to conduct a public exhibition or display of fireworks before a proximate audience shall first obtain a permit from the judge of the probate court of the county in which the public exhibition or display is to be held. Application for a permit must be made in writing and filed with the judge not less than ten days prior to the date of the proposed public exhibition or display of fireworks. Such application must contain the license number issued by the Safety Fire Commissioner for the person, firm, corporation, association, or partnership that will cause the combustion, explosion, deflagration, or detonation of pyrotechnics at the public exhibition or display. Fireworks distributors located outside this state shall obtain display permit application forms and provide the same to applicants upon request. The judge may grant a permit for the display on the following conditions:

That the display be conducted by a competent operator approved by the judge;

That the display shall be of such character as in the opinion of the judge will not be hazardous to persons or property;

That the local fire official responsible for the area in question certifies in writing that the site for the display meets his or her approval and is in compliance with all applicable codes; and

That the application be accompanied by a bond in the principal sum of $10,000.00, payable to the county in which the display is being held and conditioned for the payment of damages that may be caused either to persons or to property by reason of the display or, alternatively, that the application be accompanied by evidence that the applicant carries property liability insurance for bodily injury in the amount of not less than $25,000.00 for each person and $50,000.00 for each accident and for property damage in the amount of not less than $25,000.00 for each accident and $50,000.00 aggregate, with an insurance company duly licensed by the Commissioner of Insurance.

No permit, as provided for in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, shall be granted unless the applicant has met all the requirements of and is in full compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Safety Fire Commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

The permit provided for in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be limited to the time specified therein, such time not to exceed a two-week period. The permit shall not be transferable. In the event any fireworks bought and possessed under this Code section are not used by the licensee or in the event that there is a surplus or excess after the two-week period expires, it shall be the duty of the licensee to return such fireworks to a facility approved in accordance with Code Section 25-10-3.1 and the rules and regulations promulgated by the Safety Fire Commissioner. Fireworks stored in accordance with Code Section 25-10-3.1 and regulations shall not be deemed contraband and shall not be subject to seizure.

The judge of the probate court shall receive $10.00 for his or her services in granting or refusing the original permit and $1.00 for each copy issued, to be paid by the applicant. The judge of the probate court shall provide the Safety Fire Commissioner a copy of each permit granted prior to the proposed date of the public exhibition or display.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 550, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 11, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 945, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 294, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “Commissioner of Insurance” was substituted for “Insurance Commissioner” at the end of paragraph (a)(3) [now paragraph (a)(4)].

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2003).

25-10-4.1.
Employment of persons under age 18 in connection with fireworks storage or public displays.

No person under the age of 18 shall be employed to work at any magazine, or at any facility containing a magazine, wherein fireworks are stored or to work in any public exhibition or display of fireworks.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-10-4.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 945, § 5.

25-10-5.
License and fee for manufacture, storage, and transportation of fireworks or pyrotechnic displays; promulgation of safety regulations; conduct of inspections.

The annual license fee for any person, firm, or corporation conducting business in this state under paragraph (4) of Code Section 25-10-3 or storing fireworks under Code Section 25-10-3.1 or conducting pyrotechnic displays under Code Section 25-10-3.2 shall be $1,500.00 per year, payable to the Safety Fire Commissioner. The license shall expire on December 31 of each year. The Safety Fire Commissioner is authorized and directed to promulgate safety regulations relating to the manufacture, storage, and transportation of fireworks within this state in order to ensure the adequate protection of the employees of any such person, firm, or corporation and of the general public. The Safety Fire Commissioner is also authorized and directed to promulgate safety regulations relating to the public exhibition or display of pyrotechnics and the licensing requirements of those conducting such public exhibitions or displays, as he or she deems necessary. The Safety Fire Commissioner is further authorized and directed to conduct periodic inspections of the facilities of any person, firm, or corporation manufacturing, storing, and transporting fireworks as provided in paragraph (4) of Code Section 25-10-3 or as provided in Code Section 25-10-3.1 in order to ensure compliance with fire safety rules and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 1144, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 798, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 945, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 294, § 4; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-51/HB 1055.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2003).